District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-1219.39

Surplus from sale of land in which United States is interested to be paid into Treasury

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 718, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 7-324 to 7-329.